Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1448XS (4) 91 jda/jh S.F. 123 Section 1. Section 256C.5, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 c. âPreschool budget enrollmentâ means the figure that is 3 equal to fifty percent of the actual enrollment of eligible 4 students in the preschool programming provided by a school 5 district approved to participate in the preschool program on 6 October 1 of the base year, or the first Monday in October if 7 October 1 falls on a Saturday or Sunday. 8 Sec. 2. Section 256C.5, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 9 2025, is amended to read as follows: 10 a. For the initial school year for which a school district 11 approved to participate in the preschool program receives that 12 approval and implements the preschool program, the funding for 13 the preschool foundation aid payable to that school district 14 shall be paid from the appropriation made for that school year 15 in section 256C.6 , Code 2011, or in another appropriation 16 made for purposes of this chapter . For that school year, the 17 preschool foundation aid payable to the school district is 18 the product of the regular program state cost per pupil for 19 the school year multiplied by sixty percent of the school 20 districtâs eligible student enrollment on the date in the 21 school year determined by rule. 22 Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to school budget 23 years beginning on or after July 1, 2026. 24